Oklahoma, session 2026, SB874.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6021 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No later than December 31, 2030, the administration of


professional and occupational licensing in this state including, but


not limited to, the licensing of health care providers, behavioral


health providers, and professional occupations, shall be transferred


to Service Oklahoma.


B. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Req. No. 930 Page 1


1. Remove, abrogate, reduce, or otherwise affect any power or


duty of a licensing board to establish or enforce licensure


qualifications, examination requirements, or disciplinary standards


or procedures, or to exercise any other power or duty of the


licensing board as provided by law; or


2. Confer to Service Oklahoma any power or duty of a licensing


board provided by law including, but not limited to, those described


in paragraph 1 of this section. The sole function of Service


Oklahoma under the provisions of this section shall be to administer


the issuance of professional and occupational licenses in this


state.


C. Service Oklahoma and all licensing boards covered under this


section may promulgate rules as necessary to implement the


provisions of this section.


D. 1. The Executive Director of Service Oklahoma and the


Secretary of Licensing and Regulation shall determine the order in


which professional and occupational licensing services are onboarded


to Service Oklahoma.


2. Beginning no later than July 1, 2026, and to be completed no


later than December 31, 2030, the boards identified by the Executive


Director of Service Oklahoma and the Secretary of Licensing and


Regulation shall transition to Service Oklahoma for the application


and renewal of professional and occupational licenses.



Req. No. 930 Page 2


3. Before the third Tuesday of November of each year, Service


Oklahoma shall prepare and submit a detailed annual performance


report and recommendation to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore


of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The


first report shall be due by November 18, 2025. The report shall


include the following:


a. information related to the metrics used for assessing


customer satisfaction, transaction efficiency, and


service reliability,


b. analysis of cost-effectiveness and adherence to the


approved budget,


c. information on identified areas for improvement and a


corrective action plan, if necessary, and


d. recommendations for expanding or discontinuing


professional and occupational licensing services


established by this section.


4. Any change in professional and occupational licensing


services established by this section, unless rejected or amended as


provided by this subsection, shall become effective on July 1 of the


following calendar year.


5. If the annual performance report demonstrates that the


established performance metrics have been met or exceeded,


additional boards, commissions, or agencies identified within the


annual report shall transition their professional and occupational

Req. No. 930 Page 3


licensing services as recommended by Service Oklahoma, effective on


July 1 of the following calendar year.


6. If the annual performance report demonstrates that the


established performance metrics have not been met, the Legislature


or the Governor may amend or reject the recommendations contained


therein. Any amendment passed by a majority vote of each house of


the Legislature shall become effective as provided by the amendment


unless vetoed by the Governor.


E. Beginning January 1, 2027, Service Oklahoma shall publish


and make available publicly a quarterly report summarizing the


applicable performance metrics, customer feedback, and progress


toward achieving benchmarks established by the Executive Director of


Service Oklahoma and the Secretary of Licensing and Regulation.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-930 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:45:02 AM

















Req. No. 930 Page 4